Utah statutes.
78B-12-214.   Child care expenses -- Expenses not incurred.
(1)  The child support order shall require that each parent share equally the
reasonable work-related child care expenses of the parents.
(2) (a)  If an actual expense for child care is incurred, a parent shall begin
paying his share on a monthly basis immediately upon presentation of proof of
the child care expense, but if the child care expense ceases to be incurred,
that parent may suspend making monthly payment of that expense while it is not
being incurred, without obtaining a modification of the child support order.
(b) (i)  In the absence of a court order to the contrary, a parent who incurs
child care expense shall provide written verification of the cost and identity
of a child care provider to the other parent upon initial engagement of a
provider and thereafter on the request of the other parent.
(ii)  In the absence of a court order to the contrary, the parent shall notify
the other parent of any change of child care provider or the monthly expense
of child care within 30 calendar days of the date of the change.
(3)  In addition to any other sanctions provided by the court, a parent
incurring child care expenses may be denied the right to receive credit for
the expenses or to recover the other parent's share of the expenses if the
parent incurring the expenses fails to comply with Subsection (2)(b).
